Utah statutes.
78A-2-220.   Authority of magistrate.

(1)  Except as otherwise provided by law, a magistrate as defined in Section 77-1-3 shall have the authority to:

(a)  commit a person to incarceration prior to trial;

(b)  set or deny bail under Section 77-20-1 and release upon the payment of bail and satisfaction of any other conditions of release;

(c)  issue to any place in the state summonses and warrants of search and arrest and authorize administrative traffic checkpoints under Section 77-23-104;

(d)  conduct an initial appearance in a felony;

(e)  conduct arraignments;

(f)  conduct a preliminary examination to determine probable cause;

(g)  appoint attorneys and order recoupment of attorney fees;

(h)  order the preparation of presentence investigations and reports;

(i)  issue temporary orders as provided by rule of the Judicial Council; and

(j)  perform any other act or function authorized by statute.

(2)  A judge of the justice court may exercise the authority of a magistrate specified in Subsection (1) with the following limitations:

(a)  a judge of the justice court may conduct an initial appearance, preliminary examination, or arraignment in a felony case as provided by rule of the Judicial Council;

(b)  a judge of the justice court may not set bail in a capital felony nor deny bail in any case; and

(c)  a judge of the justice court may authorize administrative traffic checkpoints under Section 77-23-104 and issue search warrants only within the judicial district.

